Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.380

Change of registered agent of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation registered to conduct affairs in this state may change its registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change in accordance with RCW 23.95.430. The statement shall be executed by the corporation, by an officer of the corporation.

A registered agent may change its information on file with the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.435 or 23.95.440.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4123; 1993 c 356 s 19; 1982 c 35 s 146; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 76.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1993 c 356: See note following RCW 24.06.046.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.